Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 12

Office of Legal Services

3-12-101. Creation — Duties.

There is created the office of legal services, which has the duty to:

Provide summaries and abstracts of proposed legislation;

Prepare and assist in the preparation of proposed legislation and amendments;

Give legal opinions upon request of members of the general assembly;

Inform the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and appropriate committees of either house of developments which have affected or may affect state law or which may require legislative action, together with appropriate recommendations;

Review all proposed legislation as to form and style, prior to its introduction;

Conduct a continuing review of the Tennessee Code Annotated and uncodified public chapters and advise the general assembly as to legislation deemed necessary to remove defective or anachronistic laws in light of the common law and judicial decisions;

Advise the general assembly of proposals for the reform or betterment of the law recommended by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, the National Conference of State Legislatures, the Council of State Governments, the American Law Institute, any bar association or other learned body;

Receive and consider suggestions from legislators, judges, public officials, lawyers, and the public as to defects and anachronisms in the law and, if deemed appropriate, prepare legislation to remove such defects or anachronisms;

Inform the general assembly of all provisions of the Tennessee Code Annotated which have been repealed by implication or which have been held unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court or by the United States Supreme Court; and

Provide other legal services requested by the committee, the speakers, or the general assembly.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 7; T.C.A., § 3-1201.

Compiler's Notes. Revisions of laws formerly done by the law revision commission are now done in accordance with §3-12-104 by the office of legal services, which is the successor agency to the law revision commission by Acts 1978, ch. 826, § 1.

Cross-References. Code commission, office of legal services is staff for, §1-1-103.

Director of office of legal services to serve as associate member of commission for uniform legislation, §4-9-101.

Legal and administrative assistance from other state officers, departments, institutions and agencies, §3-10-105.

Office of program evaluation, joint duties in preparing and distributing legislation, §3-14-101.

Suggested revisions of laws, §3-12-104.

3-12-102. Director — Staff.

The joint legislative services committee shall appoint, subject to the approval of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, a director of legal services who shall be a graduate of an accredited law school, shall be licensed to practice law in the state of Tennessee, shall have five (5) or more years of experience in the field of legislative law, and shall have such training or practical experience in government as may be deemed necessary to perform the duties of the office. The director of legal services and other personnel shall be chosen without reference to party affiliation but solely on the basis of fitness to perform the duties of the office. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the committee. The committee shall determine the compensation of the director, while the compensation of other personnel shall be determined by the committee upon recommendation of the director. Personnel shall be employed on recommendation of the director with the approval of the speakers.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 6; T.C.A., § 3-1202.

Cross-References. Advisory group for sick leave bank for state legislative employees, §8-50-945.

Code commission, revisor of statutes within the office of legal services serves as executive secretary, §1-1-102.

Director of office of legal services to serve as associate member of commission for uniform legislation, §4-9-101.

Legal and administrative assistance from other state officers, departments, institutions and agencies, §3-10-105.

3-12-103. Office space — Facilities.

Suitable office space and facilities shall be provided in Nashville convenient to the general assembly.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 6; T.C.A., § 3-1203.

3-12-104. Suggested revisions of laws.

Suggested revisions to the Tennessee Code Annotated, to the uncodified public acts, and to other general laws of the state shall be prepared by the office of legal services. Such revisions may be initiated by the office of legal services, may be recommended by individual lawyers, legislators, judges, or other public officials, or may be directed by resolution of either or both houses of the general assembly.

Suggested revisions initiated by the office of legal services shall be transmitted with appropriate explanatory information to the standing committees by which such legislation would be reviewed.

Suggested revisions recommended by individual lawyers, legislators, judges, or other public officials shall be transmitted to the appropriate standing committees with a copy to the recommending party.

Suggested revisions directed by either house of the general assembly shall be conducted under the supervision of special committees composed of legislators and other persons knowledgeable in the particular field of inquiry. Such committees shall be appointed by the speaker of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, or both in the case of joint resolutions. The resolution shall specify the size of the special committee, the areas of representation desired, and a time for reporting. Upon completion of any suggested revision, the supervising committee shall transmit its report and recommendations to the house directing the suggested revision or to the general assembly; and that committee shall be disbanded. In preparing suggested revisions directed by resolution, the office of legal services shall have the authority to contract for assistance with any public or private agency or educational institution or to contract for any necessary assistance from individuals.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 8; T.C.A., § 3-1204.

3-12-105. Records are public — Exceptions.

All books, papers, records, and correspondence of the office of legal services pertaining to its work shall be kept in the office of legal services and all such materials are public records except:

Intraoffice memoranda made by the director of the office of legal services or the director's staff; and

Work papers and correspondence, including correspondence by electronic mail, with any person receiving service from the office of legal services.

Such papers and correspondence may become public records whenever the director of the office of legal services or the general assembly shall so order.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 9; T.C.A., § 3-1205; Acts 1999, ch. 304, § 3.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Preservation of records of permanent value, §10-7-511.

3-12-106. Relationships with members of general assembly.

The director of the office of legal services and the director's legal staff shall maintain the attorney-client relationship with each member of the general assembly with respect to communications between the member and the attorney, except as otherwise provided by the rules of either house of the general assembly.

All materials arising out of this relationship including, but not limited to, proposed bills and amendments, analyses, opinions, and memoranda prepared by an attorney are not public records nor subject to title 10, chapter 7, part 5, except as otherwise provided by the rules of either house of the general assembly or when released by the member for whom the material was prepared.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 10; T.C.A., § 3-1206.

Attorney General Opinions. An attorney in the Office of Legal Services is not required to reveal the name of a legislator who requested certain language in a bill, resolution, or amendment. Under T.C.A. §3-12-106(a), the director and members of the legal staff of the Office of Legal Services must maintain the confidentiality of communications with each member of the General Assembly, except as otherwise provided by the rules of either House. OAG 11-60, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 62 (7/22/11).

3-12-107. Legislative reference and law library.

The office of legal services shall maintain a legislative reference and law library for the use and information of the general assembly.

The library shall be staffed by a librarian who is a graduate of an accredited school of library science.

The library shall be the official depository for all research and reference materials or reports transmitted to the general assembly by national associations, including the National Conference of State Legislatures and the Council of State Governments. In addition, copies of all acts, reports as described in § 3-1-123, and publications distributed to members of the general assembly shall also be supplied to the library. Copies of the acts, journals, or other legislative publications of other states may be acquired through exchange, transfer, loan, or purchase either from the issuing state or from libraries and agencies within the state government.

The library maintained by the legislative council committee shall be transferred to the office of legal services.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 11; T.C.A., § 3-1207; Acts 2016, ch. 651, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 651, § 3, provided that this act, which amended this section, shall apply to reports filed on or after July 1, 2016.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment inserted “, reports as described in §3-1-123,” in the second sentence of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 651, § 3. July 1, 2016.

3-12-108. Reviewing reports of civil litigation — Consultation concerning employment of and assistance of legal counsel for civil litigation having significant fiscal impact.

The director of the office of legal services or the director's designee shall review all reports submitted by the attorney general and reporter pursuant to §8-6-109(d), inform the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives of such lawsuits for the purposes of §8-6-109(e), assist any legal counsel employed pursuant to §8-6-109(e), and upon request of the speakers, join with the attorney general and reporter in consultation with them on such matters. The director or designee shall consult with the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives on the employment of legal counsel pursuant to § 8-6-109(e).

Acts 1986, ch. 728, § 4.

3-12-109. Revisor of statutes — Appointment — Experience — Duties — Online capability.

The director of legal services may recommend the appointment, and the speakers may appoint, a revisor of statutes within the office of legal services.

The revisor shall be a graduate of an accredited law school, shall be licensed to practice law in the state of Tennessee, shall have five (5) or more years of experience in the field of legislative law, and shall have such training or practical experience in government as may be deemed necessary to perform the duties of the office.

The revisor shall:

Assist the director of legal services and perform duties as assigned by the director;

Perform all codification functions within the office; and

Serve as the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission.

In order to assist the chairs of the standing committees, and other members of the general assembly, it shall be the duty of the revisor, in consultation with the director of legal services, to:

Solicit and receive suggestions and supporting information from Tennessee citizens concerning state statutes or uncodified public acts that may be anachronistic, obsolete, defective, duplicative, contradictory, unnecessary, or incomprehensible;

Review and evaluate systematically such suggestions and supporting information;

Identify specific state statutes or uncodified public acts that may, in fact, be anachronistic, obsolete, defective, duplicative, contradictory, unnecessary, or incomprehensible and that may, therefore, be appropriate for legislative consideration of repeal, modification, or revision; and

Report findings and recommendations biennially, beginning in January 2017, to the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the standing committees.

The revisor shall maintain an online capability to solicit and receive suggestions and supporting information pursuant to subdivision (d)(1)(A).

Acts 2013, ch. 475, § 1; 2016, ch. 603, § 3.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote (a), which read, “There is created the office of the repealer within the office of legal services created pursuant to §3-12-101. The director of legal services shall serve as the administrator of the office of the repealer. The research analysts of the house of representatives and of the senate shall assist the office of legal services in performing the functions of the office of the repealer.”; added (b) and (c); redesignated former (b) as (d)(1); in present (d)(1), substituted “revisor, in consultation with the director of legal services” for “office of the repealer”; redesignated former (b)(1) as (d)(1)(A); in (d)(1)(A), inserted “from Tennessee citizens” following “information” and substituted “uncodified public acts” for “, or uncodified public acts, or rules”; redesignated former (b)(2) as (d)(1)(B); redesignated former (b)(3) as (d)(1)(C), and in (d)(1)(C) substituted “uncodified public acts” for “, or uncodified public acts, or rules”; redesignated former (b)(4) as (d)(1)(D); in (d)(1)(D), substituted “biennially” for annually” and “in January 2017” for “December 1, 2014”; redesignated former (c) as (d)(2); and in (d)(2) substituted “The revisor shall maintain” for “In consultation with the director of legislative information systems, the office of the repealer shall establish” and “(d)(1)(A)” for “(b)(1)”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 603, § 4. March 17, 2016.